District of Columbia statutes.
16-1385

Construction of subchapter.

This subchapter does not repeal any provisions of existing law pertaining to the condemnation or acquisition of streets, alleys, or land, or the laws relating to the subdividing of lands in the District of Columbia.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 559, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(f)(13)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1385.
1973 Ed., § 16-1385.